Utah statutes.
32B-4-502.   Storing or possessing pursuant to federal stamp.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided by this title, it is unlawful for a person who holds a stamp issued by the Bureau of Internal Revenue of the United States as a retail dealer in fermented malt liquor, or the person's operator or staff, to possess, hold, or store liquor in or on premises described in the stamp while the stamp remains in effect unless that person is:

(a)  acting for the commission; or

(b)  licensed under this title.

(2)  This section may not be construed to prevent a person from possessing and consuming, but not storing, liquor on premises described by the fermented malt liquor stamp, if that person is not:

(a)  an owner or operator of a retail dealer described in Subsection (1); or

(b)  a staff member of either the owner or operator.

